Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1 Tennessee Housing Development Agency Act
13-23-115. General powers.

The agency has all of the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, to:

Make or participate in the making of insured construction loans to qualified sponsors, developers, and builders for land development and/or for residential housing for lower and moderate income persons and families, all subject to § 13-23-116;

Make or participate in the making of insured mortgage loans to qualified sponsors, developers, builders and purchasers of residential housing for lower and moderate income persons and families, all subject to § 13-23-117;

Acquire, and contract to acquire, insured mortgages owned by lenders, and enter into advance commitments to lenders for the purchase of the mortgages, all subject to § 13-23-118;

Purchase, make, or participate in the making of insured loans to low and moderate income persons and families for the purpose of improving or rehabilitating existing residential housing and, in connection therewith, refinance existing loans involving the same property. Such loans shall be secured by a mortgage lien on the improved or rehabilitated property. The agency is also empowered to make loans to low and moderate income persons and families for the purpose of purchasing and rehabilitating residential housing;

Establish, and revise from time to time and charge and collect fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing and servicing any of its loans, notes, commitments and other evidences of indebtedness;

Pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making or purchasing its loans, notes, bonds and other evidences of indebtedness;

Acquire real property, or any interest therein, in its own name, by purchase, transfer, foreclosure or otherwise; but only as may be necessary to carry out and effectuate the purposes of this part. This subdivision (7) shall be limited to meeting the requirements of the agency relative to a delinquency or default on the payment of any loan owned by the agency;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, sell any mortgages or other personal property acquired by the agency at public or private sale and at such price or prices as it shall determine;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, collect, enforce the collection of, and foreclose on any mortgage or other collateral securing an insured construction loan or an insured mortgage loan, and acquire or take possession of such mortgage or other collateral and sell the same at public or private sale, with or without bidding, and otherwise deal with such mortgage or collateral as may be necessary to protect the interests of the agency therein;

Procure insurance against any loss in connection with its operations in such amounts, and from such insurers, as it may deem necessary or desirable;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, consent, whenever it deems it necessary or desirable in the fulfillment of its corporate purposes, to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other terms of a mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, construction loan, contract or agreement of any kind to which the agency is a party;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, invest moneys of the agency not required for immediate use, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds and notes in collateralized guaranteed investment contracts of longer than one (1) year and otherwise in the same manner as permitted by law for the investment of state funds;

Make, enter into and enforce all contracts or agreements necessary, convenient or desirable for the purposes of the agency or to the performance of its duties and execution or carrying out of its powers under this part, including contracts or agreements with any person, firm, agency, governmental agency or other entity, and all Tennessee governmental agencies are hereby authorized to enter into contracts and agreements, and otherwise cooperate with the agency to facilitate the purposes of this part;

Contract for and accept any gifts or grants or loans or appropriations of funds or property, or financial or other aid in any form from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from the state or any agency, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof, or from any other source, and comply, subject to provisions of this part and to any agreements with bondholders or noteholders, with the terms and conditions thereof. Any grant funds becoming available to the agency for subsidies of housing for low-income families, other than those becoming available to the agency in its capacity as a mortgage lender or construction loan lender, shall be paid first to the various housing authorities in the state, to meet the subsidy needs of low-rent public housing as determined necessary by the agency, before any such funds are made available for any housing financed through this part;

Borrow money and issue negotiable bonds and notes for the purposes provided in this part and provide for and secure the payment thereof and provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

Include in any borrowing such amounts as may be deemed necessary by the agency to pay financing charges, interest on the obligations for a period not exceeding two (2) years from their date, consultant, advisory and legal fees, and such other expenses as are necessary or incident to such borrowing;

Subject to any agreements with bondholders or noteholders, purchase bonds or notes of the agency out of any funds or money of the agency available therefor, and hold, cancel or resell such bonds or notes;

Make and publish rules and regulations respecting its financial assistance programs and such other rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate its corporate purposes;

Make and execute contracts for the servicing of mortgages acquired by the agency pursuant to this part, and pay the reasonable value of services rendered to the agency pursuant to those contracts;

Renegotiate, refinance or foreclose, or contract for the foreclosure of, any mortgage in default;

Waive any default or consent to the modification of the terms of any mortgage;

Commence any action to protect or enforce any right conferred upon it by any law, mortgage, contract or other agreement, and to bid for and purchase such property at any foreclosure or at any other sale, or acquire or take possession of any such property; or

Operate, manage, lease, dispose of, and otherwise deal with such property, in such manner as may be necessary to protect the interests of the agency and the holders of its bonds and notes;

Employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the agency, and fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the agency therefor. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter. The employees of the agency may participate in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system established under title 8, chapters 34-37, and the state comprehensive group insurance program;

Provide technical and advisory services to sponsors, builders, and developers of residential housing and to residents thereof, including relocation assistance services to persons and families displaced because of public works projects;

Promote research and development in proper land use planning for both urban and rural areas, in the use of technical codes in the home building industry, in planning and providing adequate community services and facilities, and in scientific methods of constructing low-cost residential housing of high durability;

Sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded;

Maintain an office in Nashville and at such other place or places as it may determine;

Adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and prescribe rules, regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

Do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and exercise the powers given and granted in this part;

Purchase, make, or participate in the making of insured loans to low and moderate income persons and families for the purpose of making energy-saving improvements to residential housing units. Such loans shall be secured by a mortgage lien on the improved or rehabilitated property. The agency shall also be empowered to make loans to low and moderate income persons and families for the purpose of purchasing solar hot water heaters for residential housing units;

Designate “areas of chronic economic distress” to be the target areas required by § 103A of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 103A);

Make grants to eligible political subdivisions and to such private nonprofit corporations that provide housing and related services in the state consistent with the purposes and mission of the agency;

Serve as a clearinghouse for properties made available through the federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act (FIRREA);

Provide a reserve for the bond and loan programs and provide for administrative and operational support of the Tennessee industrial finance corporation, created pursuant to title 4, chapter 17, part 4 [repealed]; and

When entering into any contracts or agreements authorized under this chapter, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating thereto, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties thereto shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, however, jurisdiction over the agency against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court located in Tennessee which would otherwise have jurisdiction of actions brought in contract against the agency.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 5; 1974, ch. 702, § 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(57); 1977, ch. 483, § 9; 1978, ch. 884, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2315; Acts 1981, ch. 505, § 3; 1988, ch. 900, § 6; 1990, ch. 979, § 1; 1992, ch. 724, § 3; 1998, ch. 724, § 3; 2001, ch. 253, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 2 provided that it was the legislative intent of that act to transfer, in full, the obligations, rights, duties, and funds of the Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation to the Tennessee housing development agency.

The Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act referred to in this section, is compiled primarily in 12 U.S.C. § 93 et seq., with parts compiled in 5, 15, 18 and 26 U.S.C.

Title 4, chapter 17, part 4, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Law Reviews.

The RTC's Quest For Exclusive Federal Court Jurisdiction Under FIRREA (Jeffrey S. Rosenblum), 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 725 (1994).

Attorney General Opinions. Administration of project-based section 8 housing assistance payments contracts. OAG 12-25, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 25 (2/29/12).

13-23-116. Insured construction loans for development or rehabilitation — Loans for energy-saving improvements and solar water heaters — Energy use considered in making loans.

The agency shall be empowered to make or participate in the making of insured construction loans to qualified sponsors, developers and builders for land development and/or residential housing, including the rehabilitation thereof, for lower and moderate income persons or families when the financial assistance programs of this part become effective under this part. However, the agency will not make or participate in the making of any insured construction loans until it has notified all qualified lenders that the insured construction loan program is in effect and that the agency is prepared to enter into working agreements with qualified lenders for the making of insured construction loans to qualified sponsors, developers and builders; and it has determined that the insured construction loan is not otherwise available, totally or in part, from qualified lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions. Except as provided herein, the agency may make such loans directly only after the agency has notified all qualified lenders with whom working agreements have been established of a sponsor's, developer's or builder's loan application with the agency and after a reasonable time from the date of notification, no qualified lender has agreed in writing with the sponsor to make the insured construction loan either as a mortgagee or agent for a mortgagee, upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions. Such loans made under this section to public housing agencies, public and private nonprofit corporations or other public or private nonprofit entities, or limited distribution entities, may be made by the agency to such borrower directly when the agency has determined that the loan is not otherwise available, totally or in part, from private qualified lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions.

The agency may make loans to qualified lenders under terms and conditions requiring the proceeds thereof to be used for the making of loans for the construction or rehabilitation of residential housing by qualified sponsors, developers, and builders. Such loans may be made only after the agency has issued to the qualified sponsor, developer, or builder its commitment to make or participate in the making of an insured mortgage loan, or the agency has received evidence of an existing commitment to make the permanent loan, and the qualified lender has entered into an agreement with the agency agreeing to make the construction or rehabilitation loan on terms and conditions consistent with this part and the agency's rules and regulations.

The agency may require that such loans to qualified lenders be secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a pledge of and lien upon collateral security in such amounts as the agency shall determine to be necessary to assure the payment of such loans and the interest thereon as the same become due. Such collateral security shall consist of:

Direct general obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States or the state;

Bonds, debentures, participation certificates or notes issued by the federal national mortgage association or the federal home loan mortgage corporation or by an agency or corporation which has been or is hereafter created by or pursuant to an act of the congress of the United States as an agency or instrumentality thereof; or

Mortgages insured or guaranteed by the United States or an instrumentality thereof as to payment of principal and interest.

In making loans for rehabilitation of residential housing, the agency shall consider proposals for energy-saving improvements and solar hot water heaters, and, if feasible, include the costs of such improvements or heaters in the amount of the loan.

The agency shall be empowered to make loans for energy-saving improvements and solar hot water heaters to persons and families of lower and moderate incomes for residential housing occupied and owned or rented by such person or family. Such loans shall be under such conditions, with such security, and with such repayment plans as the agency may determine. In determining repayment schedules, however, the agency shall attempt to match repayments with the savings resulting to the person or family in their residential utility bill from the improvement or solar water heater. Consideration shall also be given to providing a revolving loan fund.

The agency shall be provided with standards for a listing of reliable and efficient solar hot water heaters by the appropriate federal agency.

The agency shall give consideration, in making any loan authorized by this chapter, to energy-saving improvements and appliances included in the proposed design, improvement or rehabilitation of residential housing and shall, in making loans, give maximum consideration to any proposal which would decrease energy use typical of present construction or designs.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 6; 1974, ch. 702, § 4; 1975, ch. 320, § 2; 1977, ch. 483, § 11; 1978, ch. 884, §§ 3-5; T.C.A., § 13-2316.

13-23-117. Insured mortgage loans.

The agency shall be empowered to make or participate in the making of insured mortgage loans to qualified sponsors, developers or builders of residential housing for lower and moderate income persons and families, and to lower and moderate income persons who are purchasers of residential housing when the financial assistance programs of this part become effective under § 13-23-114. No insured mortgage loans available under this section shall be made for nonowner-occupied residential housing unless the sponsor, developer, builder or purchaser is a public housing agency, a public or private nonprofit corporation or other public or private nonprofit entity or a limited distribution entity, established or certified to do business under the laws of the state, and such public agency, corporation or entity has on file with the agency the salary schedule of its officers and employees or unless such residential housing shall be fully or partially occupied by residents assisted under a federal housing assistance program. However, the agency will not make or participate in the making of any insured mortgage loans until it has notified all qualified lenders that the insured mortgage loan program is in effect and that the agency is prepared to enter into working agreements with qualified lenders for the making of insured mortgage loans to qualified sponsors, developers, builders and purchasers; and it has determined that the insured mortgage loan is not otherwise available, totally or in part, from private qualified lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions. Except as provided herein, the agency may make such loans directly only after the agency has notified all qualified lenders with whom the agency has working agreements of a sponsor's, developer's, builder's, or purchaser's pending loan application and after a reasonable time from the date of notification, no qualified lender has agreed in writing with such qualified sponsor, developer, or builder or with such qualified purchaser to make an insured mortgage loan either as mortgagee, or as an agent for a mortgagee upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions.

Any loan made at a reduced interest rate under this section to purchasers of owner-occupied residential housing shall not be assumed or in any way transferred to a subsequent purchaser of such owner-occupied residential housing unless such purchaser qualifies as a person or family of lower or moderate income under § 13-23-103. Any loan made at a reduced rate under this section to sponsors, developers, builders and purchasers of nonowner-occupied residential housing shall not be assumed or in any way transferred to a subsequent purchaser of such residential housing unless such purchaser is a public housing agency, a public or private nonprofit corporation or other public or private nonprofit entity or a limited distribution entity, established or certified to do business under the laws of the state as hereinbefore provided in this section. Such loans made under this section to such public housing agencies, public or private nonprofit corporations or other public or private nonprofit entities, or limited distribution entities, may be made by the agency to such borrower directly when the agency has determined that the loan is not otherwise available, totally or in part, from qualified private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions.

For purposes of this chapter, “limited distribution entity” means a corporation, trust, partnership, association, individual or other entity regulated by the agency as to the amount of distribution, retirement of capital investment, or redemption of stock or other ownership interest, in such a manner that any such distribution, retirement, or redemption will not exceed in any one (1) fiscal year ten percent (10%), or such lesser percentage as shall be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the agency, of such limited distribution entity's equity in a nonowner-occupied residential housing development. The limited distribution entity's equity in the development shall consist of the difference between the agency mortgage loan on the development and the total project cost. By regulation, the agency shall prescribe the categories of costs constituting “total project cost,” including organizational expenses, land acquisition, plans and specifications, interest and financing charges paid during construction, construction costs, architects, engineering, legal and accounting fees, and a reasonable builder's profit and job overhead. A limited distribution entity's equity in a nonowner-occupied residential housing development shall be established by the agency resolution approving the mortgage loan. For the purposes of this subsection (c), that equity shall remain constant during the life of the agency mortgage loan on such housing development, except for additional equity investment made by the limited distribution entity after agency approval. Should the limited distribution entity accumulate earned surplus in addition to such maintenance and replacement reserves as the agency may require in excess of ten percent (10%) of the first full year's proposed annual rent roll, the agency may direct that the development's rents be reduced to the extent necessary to lower the earned surplus accumulation to the ten percent (10%) (or such lesser percent as the agency shall have prescribed by its rules and regulations) return on equity factor established at the granting of the agency mortgage loan.

Owner-occupied dwellings shall include one (1) to four (4) family units occupied in whole or in part by the owners, as well as units constructed or existing under the Horizontal Property Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 27.

When allocating funds for loans on new homes, the agency shall attempt to give priority to homes which incorporate energy conserving design and construction, and which include solar heating systems and solar hot water heaters.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 7; 1974, ch. 702, § 5; 1975, ch. 320, § 3; 1977, ch. 483, § 4; 1979, ch. 442, § 9; T.C.A., § 13-2317.

13-23-118. Purchase of mortgages.

The agency shall be empowered to purchase mortgages from lenders or enter into advance commitments to lenders for the purchase of mortgages during periods when the financial assistance programs of this chapter become effective under § 13-23-114.

“Mortgage,” as used in this section, means an insured loan owed to a lender secured by a first lien on a fee simple or leasehold estate in real property located in the state and improved by a residential structure.

“Real property,” as used in this subsection (b), includes air rights.

The agency may purchase or enter into advance commitments to purchase insured mortgages from lenders at such prices and upon such terms and conditions as it shall determine; provided, that the total purchase price for all mortgages which the agency commits to purchase from a lender at any one (1) time shall in no event be more than the total of the unpaid principal balances thereof.

The agency shall require as a condition of purchase of mortgages from lenders other than mortgages purchased by the agency pursuant to advanced commitment agreements that such lenders shall, within such reasonable period of time as may be approved by the agency not in excess of one hundred eighty (180) days of receipt of the purchase price, enter into written commitments to loan and shall, within such period as may be approved by the agency, loan an amount equal to the entire purchase price of such mortgages on new residential mortgages for persons and families of lower and moderate income within the state having such terms as the agency may prescribe. The agency may refuse to approve any commitment to lend on a multiple dwelling mortgage if so required by the terms of any bonding resolution.

Such new mortgages shall bear interest at a rate which does not exceed the maximum interest rate, if any, set by the agency for such mortgages. The agency may set such a maximum interest rate chargeable on such new loans at the rate that the mortgages purchased by the agency were discounted to yield plus an interest differential, not in excess of one percent (1%) per annum, which the agency from time to time shall determine to be adequate consideration to induce such lenders to sell existing mortgages to the agency and to loan an amount equal to the proceeds on new mortgages in furtherance of the purposes of and subject to the conditions of this chapter.

The agency shall require the submission to it by each lender from which the agency has purchased mortgages, evidence satisfactory to the agency of the making of new mortgage loans and in connection therewith may, through its employees or agents, inspect the books and records of any such lender.

Compliance by any lender with the terms of its agreement with or undertaking to the agency with respect to the making of any mortgage loans may be enforced by decree of any circuit or chancery court of this state. The agency may require as a condition of purchase of mortgages from any lender, which is a national banking association, the consent of such lender to the jurisdiction of the circuit or chancery court over any such proceeding. The agency may also require agreement by any lender, as a condition of the agency's purchase of mortgages from such lender, to the payment of penalties to the agency for violation by the lender of its undertakings to the agency, and such penalties shall be recoverable at the suit of the agency.

The agency shall require as a condition of purchase of any mortgage from a lender that the lender represent and warrant to the agency that:

The unpaid principal balance of the mortgage and the interest rate thereon have been accurately stated to the agency;

The amount of the unpaid principal balance is justly due and owing;

The lender has no notice of the existence of any counterclaim, offset or defense asserted by the mortgagor or the mortgagor's successor in interest;

The mortgage is evidenced by a bond or promissory note and a mortgage document which has been properly recorded with the appropriate public official;

The mortgage constitutes a valid first lien on the real property described to the agency subject only to real property taxes not yet due, installments of assessments not yet due, and easements and restrictions of record which do not adversely affect, to a material degree, the use or value of the real property or improvements thereon;

The mortgage loan when made was lawful under state law and/or federal law, whichever governs the affairs of the lender, and would be lawful on the date of purchase by the agency if made by the lender on that date in the amount of the then unpaid principal balance;

The mortgagor is not now in default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest, escrow funds, real property taxes or otherwise in the performance of the mortgagor's obligations under the mortgage documents and has not to the knowledge of the lender been in default in the performance of any such obligation for a period of longer than sixty (60) days during the life of the mortgage; and

The improvements to the mortgaged real property are covered by a valid and subsisting policy of insurance issued by a company authorized to issue such policies in this state and providing fire and extended coverage to an amount not less than ninety percent (90%) of the insurable value of the improvements to the mortgaged real property.

Each lender shall be liable to the agency for any damages suffered by the agency by reason of the untruth of any representation or the breach of any warranty and, in the event that any representation shall prove to be untrue when made or in the event of any breach of warranty, the lender shall, at the option of the agency, repurchase the mortgage for the original purchase price adjusted for amounts subsequently paid thereon, as the agency may determine.

The agency need not require the recording of an assignment of any mortgage purchased by it from a lender pursuant to this section and shall not be required to notify the mortgagor of its purchase of the mortgage. The agency shall not be required to inspect or take possession of the mortgage documents if the lender from which the mortgage is purchased by the agency shall enter a contract to service such mortgage and account to the agency therefor.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 8; T.C.A., § 13-2318.